tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Amerikan Futbolu > Amerikan Futbolu Antrenman Ekipmanları: Amerikan futbolu blokaj yastıkları; Amerikan Futbolu Kuklalar ve Kızaklı Kuklalar; Amerikan futbolu pas fileleri ve hedefleri; Amerikan futbolu mücadele halkaları; Bayrak futbolu kemerleri ve setleri
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Futbol amerykański > Sprzęt treningowy do futbolu amerykańskiego: Tarcze treningowe do futbolu amerykańskiego; Manekiny i manekiny do przepychania do futbolu amerykańskiego; Siatki i cele do trenowania podań w futbolu amerykańskim; Pierścienie treningowe do futbolu amerykańskiego; Pasy i zestawy do futbolu flagowego
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Αμερικανικό ποδόσφαιρο > Προπονητικός εξοπλισμός αμερικανικού ποδοσφαίρου: Μαξιλάρια μπλοκαρίσματος αμερικανικού ποδοσφαίρου; Ομοιώματα & έλκηθρα αμερικανικού ποδοσφαίρου; Δίχτυα και στόχοι πάσας αμερικανικού ποδοσφαίρου; Δακτύλιοι τάκλιν αμερικανικού ποδοσφαίρου; Ζώνες και σετ flag football
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > อเมริกันฟุตบอล > อุปกรณ์ฝึกซ้อมอเมริกันฟุตบอล: เป้าซ้อมบล็อกอเมริกันฟุตบอล; หุ่นจำลองและแท่นเลื่อนอเมริกันฟุตบอล; ตาข่ายและเป้าซ้อมขว้างอเมริกันฟุตบอล; ห่วงซ้อมแท็กเกิลอเมริกันฟุตบอล; เข็มขัดและชุดอุปกรณ์แฟลกฟุตบอล
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Amerikai futball > Amerikaifutball-edzőfelszerelés: Amerikai futball blokkoló párnák; Amerikaifutball-babák és -szánkók; Amerikai futball passzoló hálók és célpontok; Amerikai futball szerelőgyűrűk; Flag futball övek és szettek
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Futebol Americano > Equipamento de Treino de Futebol Americano: Almofadas de bloqueio de futebol americano; Trenós e Bonecos de Futebol Americano; Redes e alvos de passe de futebol americano; Anéis de placagem de futebol americano; Cintos e conjuntos de flag football
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > American Football > American Football trainingsmaterialen: Stootkussens voor American football; American Football dummy's en sleden; Werpnetten en doelen voor American football; Tackleringen voor American football; Riemen en sets voor flag football
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Американски футбол > Тренировъчно оборудване за американски футбол: Блокиращи щитове за американски футбол; Тренировъчни манекени и шейни за американски футбол; Мрежи и мишени за подаване за американски футбол; Пръстени за тренировка за американски футбол; Колани и комплекти за флаг футбол
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Americký fotbal > Tréninková výstroj pro americký fotbal: Blokovací narážeče na americký fotbal; Tréninkové figuríny a sáně pro americký fotbal; Sítě a terče pro trénink přihrávek v americkém fotbale; Tréninkové skládací kruhy na americký fotbal; Opasky a sady na flag fotbal
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Americký futbal > Tréningové vybavenie pre americký futbal: Chrániče na americký futbal; Figuríny a prekážky na americký futbal; Sieťky a terče na prihrávky v americkom futbale; Tréningové kruhy pre americký futbal; Opasky a sady na flag futbal
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Amerikansk fotball > Treningsutstyr for amerikansk fotball: Blokkeringsputer til amerikansk fotball; Dukker og sleder for amerikansk fotball; Kastenett og blinker til amerikansk fotball; Taklingsringer til amerikansk fotball; Belter og sett til flaggfotball
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Американский футбол > Тренировочный инвентарь для американского футбола: Блокировочные подушки для американского футбола; Тренировочные манекены и сани для американского футбола; Сетки и мишени для отработки пасов (американский футбол); Кольца для отработки захватов (американский футбол); Пояса и наборы для флаг-футбола
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Amerikansk fodbold – bold > Amerikansk fodbold – træningsudstyr: Blokeringspuder til amerikansk fodbold; Amerikansk fodbold – dummies og sleds; Kastenet og -mål til amerikansk fodbold; Takleringe til amerikansk fodbold; Bælter og sæt til flag football
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Fútbol americano > Equipo de entrenamiento de fútbol americano: Protectores de bloqueo para fútbol americano; Muñecos y trineos de fútbol americano; Redes y objetivos de pase para fútbol americano; Aros de tacleo para fútbol americano; Cinturones y sets de fútbol bandera
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Amerikietiškasis futbolas > Amerikietiškojo futbolo treniruočių įranga: Amerikietiško futbolo blokavimo skydai; Amerikietiškojo futbolo manekenai ir rogutės; Amerikietiško futbolo perdavimų tinklai ir taikiniai; Amerikietiško futbolo kontaktinio treniravimo žiedai; Bekontakčio futbolo diržai ir rinkiniai
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Football américain > Équipement d'entraînement pour le football américain: Boucliers de blocage de football américain; Mannequins et sleds pour le football américain; Filets et cibles de passe de football américain; Anneaux de plaquage de football américain; Ceintures et kits de flag football
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Ameriški nogomet > Oprema za vadbo ameriškega nogometa: Ameriški nogomet Blazine za blokiranje; Vadbene lutke in sani za ameriški nogomet; Ameriški nogomet Mreže in tarče za podajanje; Obroči za zbijanje za ameriški nogomet; Pasovi in kompleti za flag football
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > American Football > Trainingsausrüstung für American Football: Blocking-Pads für American Football; Dummies und Schlitten für American Football; Pass-Netze & Zielscheiben für American Football; Tackle-Ringe für American Football; Flag-Football-Gürtel & Sets
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > アメリカンフットボール > アメリカンフットボール用トレーニング機器: アメリカンフットボール用ブロッキングパッド; アメリカンフットボール用ダミー&ソリ; アメリカンフットボール用パッシングネット・ターゲット; アメリカンフットボール用タックルリング; フラッグフットボール用ベルト・セット
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Američki nogomet > Oprema za trening američkog nogometa: Štitnici za blokiranje za američki nogomet; Dummy lutke i sanjke za američki nogomet; Mreže i mete za dodavanje za američki nogomet; Prstenovi za američki nogomet; Pojasevi i kompleti za flag football
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Amerikkalainen jalkapallo > Harjoitteluvarusteet, amerikkalainen jalkapallo: Amerikkalaisen jalkapallon torjuntatyynyt; Nuket ja kelkat, amerikkalainen jalkapallo; Amerikkalaisen jalkapallon heittoverkot ja -maalit; Amerikkalaisen jalkapallon taklausrenkaat; Lippupallovyöt ja -setit
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 美式橄榄球 > 美式橄榄球训练装备: 美式橄榄球挡截垫; 美式橄榄球模型和雪橇; 美式橄榄球传球网与标靶; 美式橄榄球擒抱训练圈; 腰旗橄榄球腰带与套装
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Amerikansk fotboll > Amerikansk fotboll träningsredskap: Blockeringskuddar för amerikansk fotboll; Amerikansk fotboll målgubbar & motstånd; Kastnät och mål för amerikansk fotboll; Tacklingsringar för amerikansk fotboll; Bälten och set för flaggfotboll
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Football americano > Attrezzatura da allenamento da football americano: Scudi da bloccaggio da football americano; Dummy e slitte da football americano; Reti da lancio e bersagli da football americano; Anelli da placcaggio da football americano; Cinture e set da flag football
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Fotbal american > Echipament de antrenament pentru fotbal american: Perne de blocare pentru fotbal american; Manechine și sănii pentru fotbal american; Fileuri și ținte de pase pentru fotbal american; Inele de tackling pentru fotbal american; Centuri și seturi pentru fotbal cu steaguri
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 아메리칸 풋볼 > 미식축구 훈련 장비: 미식축구 블로킹 패드; 미식축구 인형 및 썰매; 미식축구 패싱 네트 및 타겟; 미식축구 태클 링; 플래그 풋볼 벨트 및 세트
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Bóng bầu dục Mỹ > Trang thiết bị tập luyện bóng bầu dục Mỹ: Đệm cản phá bóng bầu dục Mỹ; Xe trượt và hình nộm tập bóng bầu dục Mỹ; Lưới và mục tiêu tập chuyền bóng bầu dục Mỹ; Vòng tập húc bóng bầu dục Mỹ; Bộ và thắt lưng bóng bầu dục giật cờ
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Futebol americano > Equipamentos para treino de futebol americano: Escudos de bloqueio para futebol americano; Bonecos e trenós de futebol americano; Redes e alvos de passe para futebol americano; Anéis de tackle para futebol americano; Cintos e conjuntos de flag football
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > American Football > American Football Training Equipment: American Football Blocking Pads; American Football Dummies & Sleds; American Football Passing Nets & Targets; American Football Tackle Rings; Flag Football Belts & Sets
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 美式足球 > 美式足球訓練器材: 美式足球擋截訓練墊; 美式足球假人及負重雪橇; 美式足球傳球網與標靶; 美式足球擒抱訓練圈; 腰旗美式足球腰帶與套組